Utah statutes.
54-1-13.   Commission exploration and development of cleaner air options.

(1)  The commission shall immediately initiate and conduct proceedings to explore and develop options and opportunities for advancing and promoting measures designed to result in cleaner air in the state through the enhanced use of alternative fuel vehicles, including:

(a)  consideration of the role that gas corporations should play in the enhancement and expansion of the infrastructure and maintenance and other facilities for alternative fuel vehicles;

(b)  the potential funding options available to pay for the enhancement and expansion of infrastructure and facilities for alternative fuel vehicles;

(c)  the role local government, including any local government entity established for the purpose of facilitating conversion to alternative fuel vehicles and of promoting the enhancement and expansion of the infrastructure and facilities for those vehicles, can or should play; and

(d)  the most effective ways to overcome any obstacles to converting to alternative fuel vehicles and to enhancing and expanding the infrastructure and facilities for alternative fuel vehicles.

(2)  As soon as an interlocal entity described in Subsection 11-13-224(2) is created, the commission shall seek, encourage, and accept the interlocal entity's participation in the commission's proceedings under this section.

(3)  By September 30, 2013, the commission and the interlocal entity described in Subsection 11-13-224(2) shall report to the governor, the Legislative Management Committee, and the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee:

(a)  the results of the commission proceedings under Subsection (1); and

(b) recommendations for specific actions to implement mechanisms to provide funding for the enhancement and expansion of the infrastructure and facilities for alternative fuel vehicles.



Enacted by Chapter 311, 2013 General Session

